Utah statutes.
9-4-614.   Preference for elderly and persons with a disability.

(1)  For the purpose of increasing the supply of low-rent housing and related facilities for medium and low-income elderly and medium and low-income persons with a disability, an authority may exercise any of its powers under this part in projects involving dwelling accommodations designed specifically for these persons.

(2)  For dwelling units in any projects suitable to the needs of the elderly or persons with a disability, special preference may be extended in admission to those dwelling units to these persons of medium and low income.

